src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
* LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED  puätˈtaz

* LEXICON FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED  (11) 
Vowel_raising, palatalization, Cons-grade-retension

VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD, VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD and VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED come here

* : DenominalAdjsCShort ;  (Feist 2012: 200-201) +Der+Der/teqm

* LEXICON VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED   (7)

* LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED  (6)

* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/st+V:%^Pen%^Allegro»%{ʼØ%}st VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;  no allegro

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
